North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-35.1 Chemigation Regulation [Repealed]

4-35.1-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 93, § 1; 1989, ch. 88, § 5; 1991, ch. 228, § 1; 2001, ch. 74, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35.1-02.
Statement of compliance. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 93, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35.1-03.
Rules — Standards for application through irrigation system, installation, maintenance, and modifications. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 93, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35.1-04.
Inspections. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 93, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35.1-05.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 93, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-35.1-06.
Penalties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 93, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.